Illinois, session 104th, HB3632.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Homicide Victims' Families' Rights Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act:7    "Agency" means a law enforcement entity of a unit of local 8government that is vested by law or ordinance with the duty to 9maintain public order and to enforce criminal laws or 10ordinances.11    "Applicable agency" means a law enforcement agency that is 12investigating or has investigated the murder of the victim.13    "Open unresolved murder" means any criminal activity in 14which death occurred more than 3 years prior to the date of the 15application under subsection (a) of Section 10, for which all 16probative investigative leads have been exhausted, and for 17which no likely perpetrator has been identified.18    "Designated person" means (i) an immediate family member 19or (ii) a similarly situated person as the Attorney General 20shall by rule define.21    "Immediate family member" means a parent, parent-in-law, 22grandparent, grandparent-in-law, sibling, spouse, child, 23stepchild, foster parent, or guardian of a murder victim.  HB3632 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 08473 RLC 18525 b1    "Victim" means the victim of a murder. 2    Section 10. Case file review.3    (a) An applicable agency shall review the case file 4regarding an open unresolved murder upon written application 5by a designated person to determine if a full reinvestigation 6would result in probative investigative leads.7    (b) The case file review shall include, but is not limited 8to:9        (1) an analysis of what investigative steps or 10    follow-up steps may have been missed in the initial 11    investigation;12        (2) an assessment of whether witnesses should be 13    interviewed or re-interviewed;14        (3) an examination of physical evidence to see if all 15    appropriate forensic testing and analysis was performed in 16    the first instance or if additional testing might produce 17    information relevant to the investigation; and18        (4) a modernization of the file to bring it up to 19    current investigative standards to the extent it would 20    help develop probative leads.21    (c) The person or persons performing the review required 22by subsection (a) shall not have previously investigated the 23murder. This subsection (c) does not apply to law enforcement 24agencies located in municipalities that have fewer than 35,000 25inhabitants.  HB3632 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 08473 RLC 18525 b1    (d) The applicable agency shall confirm in writing receipt 2of a request made under subsection (a).3    (e) Only one case review shall be undertaken at any one 4time with respect to the same open unresolved murder victim.5    (f) No later than 6 months after the receipt of the written 6application submitted pursuant to subsection (a), the 7applicable agency shall conclude its case file review and 8reach a conclusion whether a full reinvestigation under 9Section 25 is warranted.10    (g) The applicable agency may extend the limit in 11subsection (f) for periods not to exceed 6 months if the agency 12makes a finding that the number of case files to be reviewed 13make it impracticable to comply with said limit without 14unreasonably taking resources from other law enforcement 15activities.16    For cases for which the time limit in subsection (f) is 17extended, the applicable agency shall provide notice and an 18explanation of its reasoning to the designated person who 19filed the written application under this Section.  20    Section 15. Application. Each agency shall develop a 21written application to be used for designated persons to 22request a case file review under Section 10. 23    Section 20. Notice. Each agency shall provide notice of 24the rights under this Act to designated persons as soon as is   HB3632 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 08473 RLC 18525 b1practicable after being made aware of a murder. 2    Section 25. Full reinvestigation. 3    (a) The applicable agency shall conduct a full 4reinvestigation of the open unresolved murder if the review of 5the case file required by Section 10 concludes that a full 6reinvestigation of the open unresolved murder would result in 7probative investigative leads.8    (b) A full reinvestigation shall include analyzing all 9evidence regarding the open unresolved murder at issue for the 10purpose of developing probative investigative leads as to the 11perpetrator.12    (c) The person or persons performing the full 13reinvestigation required by subsection (a) shall not have 14previously investigated the murder, except for the case file 15review pursuant to Section 10, unless there is at least one 16other person performing the full reinvestigation who has not 17previously investigated the murder. 18    (d) Only one full reinvestigation shall be undertaken at 19any one time with respect to the same open unresolved murder 20victim. 21    Section 30. Consultation and updates. 22    (a) The applicable agency shall consult with the 23designated person who filed the written application under 24Section 10 and provide him or her with periodic updates during   HB3632 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 08473 RLC 18525 b1the case file review and full reinvestigation.2    (b) The applicable agency shall meet with the designated 3person and discuss the evidence to explain to the designated 4person who filed the written application under Section 10 its 5decision whether to engage in the full reinvestigation 6provided for under Section 25 at the conclusion of the case 7file review.  8    Section 35. Subsequent reviews.9    (a) If a case file review is completed and a conclusion is 10reached not to conduct a full reinvestigation, no additional 11case file review shall be undertaken for a period of 5 years, 12unless there is newly discovered, materially significant 13evidence.14    (b) If a full reinvestigation is done and a suspect is not 15identified at its conclusion, no additional case file review 16or full reinvestigation shall be undertaken for a period of 5 17years, unless there is newly discovered, materially 18significant new evidence. 19    Section 36. Family liaison officers.20    (a) Each agency shall employ or designate a minimum number 21of family liaison officers proportionate to the average number 22of homicides in the agency's jurisdiction within the previous 235 years of the date of employment with the maximum ratio of 40 24homicides per each family liaison officer employed or   HB3632 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 08473 RLC 18525 b1designated. Each agency may establish a lower ratio for hiring 2or designating family liaison officers.3    (b) The primary purpose of a family liaison officer is 4that of an investigator. A family liaison officer's role is to 5gather evidence and information from the family to contribute 6to the investigation and preserve its integrity. The family 7liaison officer shall also provide support and information, in 8a sensitive and compassionate manner, securing confidence and 9trust of families of victims of crime (primarily homicide), 10road fatality, mass disaster, or other critical incident, 11ensuring family members are given timely information in 12accordance with the needs of the investigation.13    (c) The family liaison officer shall:14        (1) establish and maintain a supportive and ethical 15    relationship with the family, building trust, in line with 16    local and national guidance to gathering information and 17    evidence;18        (2) act as a single point of contact between families 19    and investigation teams when a homicide occurs to enable 20    information to be shared which may assist in the 21    investigation;22        (3) collect best evidence to enable identification of 23    a reported missing person (high risk of criminality or 24    vulnerability) or identify the deceased, and consider 25    potential future viewing requirements and postmortem with 26    the family to further the investigation;  HB3632 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 08473 RLC 18525 b1        (4) provide information regarding additional services 2    available for families, including providing information 3    about open unresolved murders to support agencies, and 4    explain criminal justice and coroner's procedures, so that 5    they can access all available services and support;6        (5) contact the family at least once every 30 days for 7    the first 6 months the case is open then once per quarter 8    until the case becomes inactive. The family liaison 9    officer shall work closely with the lead investigator to 10    obtain substantive updates on the case prior to contacting 11    the family. The lead investigator has discretion over any 12    information shared with the family and shall communicate 13    with the family liaison accordingly. If the family liaison 14    officer is contacted by the family regarding an open case 15    at any time, the family liaison officer shall return the 16    call within 5 business days with all relevant information 17    regarding a police investigation, in line with the 18    strategy of the chief investigating officer or lead 19    investigator so that they are informed of progress;20        (6) obtain victimology and family personal statements 21    and any other material to enable the gathering of evidence 22    and to support the investigative process;23        (7) document any requests or complaints, or both, made 24    by the family, to be forwarded for the consideration of 25    the chief investigating officer or lead investigator;26        (8) record all contact with the family to ensure   HB3632 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 08473 RLC 18525 b1    compliance with this Act, the Criminal Identification Act, 2    the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Act, the Missing 3    Children Records Act, the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, the 4    Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963, the Rights of Crime 5    Victims and Witnesses Act, and the Police and Community 6    Relations Improvement Act to maintain the integrity of the 7    investigation; 8        (9) be the liaison between families and the coroner or 9    medical examiner and chief investigating officer or lead 10    investigator in relation to the Illinois Anatomical Gift 11    Act; and12        (10) track the case files required in Section 10, the 13    date of review of the case file, confirm the receipt of the 14    request of the case file, provide notice to the family if 15    an extension of review has been made, and consult with the 16    family on the investigation of the case.17    (d) A family liaison officer may not be assigned to work 18patrol or attached to other special units while designated as 19a family liaison officer.20    (e) The training of all family liaison officers shall 21include instruction on victim-centered, trauma-informed 22investigation as established by the Illinois Law Enforcement 23Training Standards Board.24    (f) Except in emergencies or other exigent circumstances, 25a family liaison officer shall exclusively investigate 26homicide cases.   HB3632 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 08473 RLC 18525 b1    Section 40. Data collection; annual report. 2    (a) Beginning 3 years after the effective date of this 3Act, the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 4annually shall publish statistics regarding the number of open 5unresolved murders. The statistics published under this 6subsection at a minimum shall be broken down by the degree of 7murder, the type of weapon used in the murder, the location of 8the murder and by agency, in addition to the criteria set forth 9in subsection (b).10    (b) Each applicable agency annually shall submit data to 11the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority regarding 12the open unresolved murders within its jurisdiction, 13including, but not limited to, the number of requests received 14under subsection (a) of Section 10, the number of extensions 15granted and an explanation of reasons provided under 16subsection (g) of Section 10, the number of full 17reinvestigations initiated and closed under Section 25, and 18the number of suspects identified, arrested, charged, and 19convicted for each open unresolved murder investigated by the 20applicable agency under this Act during the year reported. The 21data shall also include what cases are being solved and which 22cases are not being solved, identifying the age, race, and 23ethnicity of the victim whose case is being solved and not 24being solved and the cases that are being solved by 25exceptional means.  HB3632 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 08473 RLC 18525 b1    (c) The Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority 2shall submit an annual report to the General Assembly and the 3Governor compiling the information received by the Authority 4under subsection (b). 5    Section 45. Procedures to promote compliance. 6    (a) Not later than one year after the effective date of 7this Act, the head of each agency shall adopt rules to enforce 8the rights of designated persons and to ensure compliance by 9responsible officials with the obligations described in this 10Act.11    (b) The rules adopted under subsection (a) shall:12        (1) designate an administrative authority within the 13    agency to receive and investigate complaints relating to 14    the provision or violation of the rights of designated 15    persons;16        (2) require a course of training for employees of the 17    agency regarding the rights provided under this Act;18        (3) contain disciplinary sanctions, including 19    suspension or termination from employment, for employees 20    of the agency who willfully or wantonly fail to comply 21    with this Act;22        (4) establish a process for investigations into the 23    conduct of persons no longer employed by a law enforcement 24    agency when a complaint is filed and a process for 25    referrals for prosecution to the appropriate State's   HB3632 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 08473 RLC 18525 b1    Attorney; and2        (5) provide that the head of the agency, or the head of 3    the agency's designee, shall be the final arbiter of the 4    complaint, and that there shall be no judicial review of 5    the final decision of the head of the agency by a 6    complainant.  7    Section 50. Withholding information. Nothing in this Act 8shall require an agency to provide information that would 9endanger the safety of any person, unreasonably impede an 10ongoing investigation, violate a court order, or violate legal 11obligations regarding privacy. 12    Section 55. Multiple agencies.13    (a) If there is more than one possible applicable agency, 14each applicable agency shall coordinate its case file review 15or full reinvestigation such that there is only one joint case 16file review or full reinvestigation occurring at a time in 17compliance with subsection (e) of Section 10 or subsection (d) 18of Section 25, as applicable.19    (b) If an immediate family member believes there was bias 20demonstrated in the handling of the initial case, any case 21file review, or any full reinvestigation by any of the 22possible applicable agencies, the family member may 23communicate that concern to the Attorney General. The Attorney 24General shall review the allegations made by the immediate   HB3632 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 08473 RLC 18525 b1family member to determine whether, in the interest of 2justice, another law enforcement agency should conduct the 3case file review or the full reinvestigation, as applicable. 4    Section 60. Applicability. This Act applies to murders 5occurring on or after January 1, 1970, and only to law 6enforcement agencies located wholly within the boundaries of 7counties with a population of 3,000,000 or more. 8    Section 100. The Illinois Criminal Justice Information Act 9is amended by changing Section 7 as follows: 10    (20 ILCS 3930/7)  (from Ch. 38, par. 210-7)11    Sec. 7. Powers and duties. The Authority shall have the 12following powers, duties, and responsibilities:13        (a) To develop and operate comprehensive information 14    systems for the improvement and coordination of all 15    aspects of law enforcement, prosecution, and corrections;16        (b) To define, develop, evaluate, and correlate State 17    and local programs and projects associated with the 18    improvement of law enforcement and the administration of 19    criminal justice;20        (c) To act as a central repository and clearing house 21    for federal, state, and local research studies, plans, 22    projects, proposals, and other information relating to all 23    aspects of criminal justice system improvement and to   HB3632 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 08473 RLC 18525 b1    encourage educational programs for citizen support of 2    State and local efforts to make such improvements;3        (d) To undertake research studies to aid in 4    accomplishing its purposes;5        (e) To monitor the operation of existing criminal 6    justice information systems in order to protect the 7    constitutional rights and privacy of individuals about 8    whom criminal history record information has been 9    collected;10        (f) To provide an effective administrative forum for 11    the protection of the rights of individuals concerning 12    criminal history record information;13        (g) To issue regulations, guidelines, and procedures 14    which ensure the privacy and security of criminal history 15    record information consistent with State and federal laws;16        (h) To act as the sole administrative appeal body in 17    the State of Illinois to conduct hearings and make final 18    determinations concerning individual challenges to the 19    completeness and accuracy of criminal history record 20    information;21        (i) To act as the sole, official, criminal justice 22    body in the State of Illinois to conduct annual and 23    periodic audits of the procedures, policies, and practices 24    of the State central repositories for criminal history 25    record information to verify compliance with federal and 26    state laws and regulations governing such information;  HB3632 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 08473 RLC 18525 b1        (j) To advise the Authority's Statistical Analysis 2    Center;3        (k) To apply for, receive, establish priorities for, 4    allocate, disburse, and spend grants of funds that are 5    made available by and received on or after January 1, 1983 6    from private sources or from the United States pursuant to 7    the federal Crime Control Act of 1973, as amended, and 8    similar federal legislation, and to enter into agreements 9    with the United States government to further the purposes 10    of this Act, or as may be required as a condition of 11    obtaining federal funds;12        (l) To receive, expend, and account for such funds of 13    the State of Illinois as may be made available to further 14    the purposes of this Act;15        (m) To enter into contracts and to cooperate with 16    units of general local government or combinations of such 17    units, State agencies, and criminal justice system 18    agencies of other states for the purpose of carrying out 19    the duties of the Authority imposed by this Act or by the 20    federal Crime Control Act of 1973, as amended;21        (n) To enter into contracts and cooperate with units 22    of general local government outside of Illinois, other 23    states' agencies, and private organizations outside of 24    Illinois to provide computer software or design that has 25    been developed for the Illinois criminal justice system, 26    or to participate in the cooperative development or design   HB3632 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 08473 RLC 18525 b1    of new software or systems to be used by the Illinois 2    criminal justice system;3        (o) To establish general policies concerning criminal 4    justice information systems and to promulgate such rules, 5    regulations, and procedures as are necessary to the 6    operation of the Authority and to the uniform 7    consideration of appeals and audits;8        (p) To advise and to make recommendations to the 9    Governor and the General Assembly on policies relating to 10    criminal justice information systems;11        (q) To direct all other agencies under the 12    jurisdiction of the Governor to provide whatever 13    assistance and information the Authority may lawfully 14    require to carry out its functions;15        (r) To exercise any other powers that are reasonable 16    and necessary to fulfill the responsibilities of the 17    Authority under this Act and to comply with the 18    requirements of applicable State or federal law or 19    regulation;20        (s) To exercise the rights, powers, and duties which 21    have been vested in the Authority by the Illinois Uniform 22    Conviction Information Act;23        (t) (Blank);24        (u) To exercise the rights, powers, and duties vested 25    in the Authority by the Illinois Public Safety Agency 26    Network Act;  HB3632 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 08473 RLC 18525 b1        (v) To provide technical assistance in the form of 2    training to local governmental entities within Illinois 3    requesting such assistance for the purposes of procuring 4    grants for gang intervention and gang prevention programs 5    or other criminal justice programs from the United States 6    Department of Justice; 7        (w) To conduct strategic planning and provide 8    technical assistance to implement comprehensive trauma 9    recovery services for violent crime victims in underserved 10    communities with high levels of violent crime, with the 11    goal of providing a safe, community-based, culturally 12    competent environment in which to access services 13    necessary to facilitate recovery from the effects of 14    chronic and repeat exposure to trauma. Services may 15    include, but are not limited to, behavioral health 16    treatment, financial recovery, family support and 17    relocation assistance, and support in navigating the legal 18    system; and 19        (x) To coordinate statewide violence prevention 20    efforts and assist in the implementation of trauma 21    recovery centers and analyze trauma recovery services. The 22    Authority shall develop, publish, and facilitate the 23    implementation of a 4-year statewide violence prevention 24    plan, which shall incorporate public health, public 25    safety, victim services, and trauma recovery centers and 26    services; and .   HB3632 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 08473 RLC 18525 b1        (y) To compile and publish information regarding open 2    unresolved murders as provided in Section 40 of the 3    Homicide Victims' Families' Rights Act. 4    The requirement for reporting to the General Assembly 5shall be satisfied by filing copies of the report as required 6by Section 3.1 of the General Assembly Organization Act, and 7filing such additional copies with the State Government Report 8Distribution Center for the General Assembly as is required 9under paragraph (t) of Section 7 of the State Library Act.10(Source: P.A. 103-798, eff. 1-1-25.)